el: Συμβατό πεντάλ πίεσης: Ψηλός κορμός; Χαμηλός κορμός; Ιδιόκτητο; Βιδωτό; Λοξός κορμός; Κουμπωτό; Γενικής χρήσης/Πολλαπλό; Άλλο
en: Compatible presser foot: High shank; Low shank; Proprietary; Screw-on; Slant shank; Snap-on; Universal/Multiple; Other
de: Kompatibler Nähfuß: Hoher Schaft; Niedriger Schaft; Proprietär; Zum Anschrauben; Schräger Schaft; Snap-on; Universal/Mehrere; Sonstige
zh-CN: 适配压脚: 高脚; 低脚; 专有; 螺丝固定; 斜脚; 卡入式; 通用/多个; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis talp: Magas szárú; Alacsony szárú; Saját / védett; Felcsavarozható; Ferde szárú; Bepattintós; Univerzális/többféle; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel trykkfot: Høy stamme; Lav stamme; Proprietær; Skrufeste; Skrå stamme; Klikkfeste; Universell/flere; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiva šivalna tačka: Visoko steblo; Nizko steblo; Lastniško; Privijačeno; Nagnjeno steblo; Sistem na klik (snap-on); Univerzalno/večnamensko; Drugo
pt-BR: Calcador compatível: Haste alta; Haste baixa; Proprietária; Parafusada; Haste inclinada; Encaixe rápido (snap-on); Universal/Múltipla; Outro
th: ตีนผีเย็บผ้าที่เข้ากันได้: ก้านสูง; ก้านต่ำ; กรรมสิทธิ์; แบบขันสกรู; ก้านเอียง; แบบ Snap-on; อเนกประสงค์/หลายประเภท; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna pritisna stopica: Visoki držač (high shank); Niski držač (low shank); Vlasnički; Pričvršćivanje vijkom; Kosi držač (slant shank); Pričvršćivanje pritiskom (snap-on); Univerzalno/višestruko; Ostalo
ru: Совместимая прижимная лапка: Высокий адаптер; Низкая посадка; Проприетарная; Привинчивающаяся; Наклонная посадка; Защелкивающаяся; Универсальная / несколько; Другое
cs: Kompatibilní přítlačná patka: Vysoký dřík; Nízký dřík; Proprietární; Šroubovací; Šikmý dřík; Nacvakávací; Univerzální/vícenásobné; Jiné
lt-LT: Suderinama spaudimo pėdelė: Aukštas kotelis; Žemas kotelis; Nuosavybinis; Prisukamas; Pasviręs kotelis; Užspaudžiamas; Universalus / keli; Kita
fi: Yhteensopiva paininjalka: Korkea varsi; Matala varsi; Omistusoikeudellinen; Ruuvattava; Vino varsi; Snap-on; Yleinen/useita; Muu
vi: Chân vịt tương thích: Trục cao; Trục thấp; Độc quyền; Bắt vít; Trục xiên; Gắn khớp (Snap-on); Phổ thông/Nhiều loại; Khác
ko: 호환 노루발: 하이 섕크; 로우 섕크; 독점; 나사 고정식; 슬랜트 섕크; 스냅온; 범용/다중; 기타
pl: Kompatybilna stopka dociskowa: Wysoki uchwyt; Niski uchwyt; Zastrzeżone; Przykręcane; Skośny uchwyt; Zatrzaskowe; Uniwersalne / wielokrotne; Inne
da: Kompatibel trykfod: Højt skaft; Lavt skaft; Navnebeskyttet; Skruemonteret; Skråt skaft; Klikmonteret; Universel/flere; Andet
zh-TW: 相容壓布腳: 高柄; 低柄; 專有; 鎖螺絲式; 斜柄; 卡扣式; 通用/多種; 其他
ja: 互換性のある押さえ金: ハイシャンク; ローシャンク; 独自の; ネジ止め式; スラントシャンク; スナップオン式; ユニバーサル/複数; その他
tr: Uyumlu baskı ayağı: Yüksek saplı; Alçak saplı; Özel; Vidalı; Eğik saplı; Çıtçıtlı; Evrensel/Çoklu; Diğer
sv: Kompatibel pressarfot: Högt fäste; Lågt fäste; Tillverkarspecifik; Skruvfäste; Snett fäste; Klickfäste (snap-on); Universell/flera; Övrigt
es: Prensatelas compatible: Vástago alto; Vástago bajo; Patentado; Atornillable; Vástago inclinado; A presión; Universal/múltiple; Otro
sk-SK: Kompatibilná prítlačná pätka: Vysoká stopka; Nízka stopka; Proprietárna; Skrutkovacia; Šikmá stopka; Nacvakávacia; Univerzálna/viacero; Iné
bg-BG: Съвместимо краче за шевна машина: Високо краче; Ниско краче; Собствено; Завинтващо се; Наклонено краче; Щракващо се; Универсално/множество; Друго
pt-PT: Pé calcador compatível: Haste alta; Haste baixa; Proprietário; De enroscar; Haste inclinada; De encaixe; Universal/múltiplo; Outro
fr: Pied presseur compatible: Tige haute; Tige basse; Propriétaire; À visser; Tige inclinée; Encliquetable; Universel/Multiple; Autre
ro-RO: Picioruș presor compatibil: Tijă înaltă; Tijă joasă; Proprietar; Prindere cu șurub; Tijă înclinată; Prindere rapidă (snap-on); Universal / multiplu; Altele
nl: Compatibele naaivoet: Hoge schacht; Lage schacht; Eigen; Opschroefbaar; Schuine schacht; Klikbaar; Universeel/meerdere; Overig
it: Piedino compatibile: Attacco alto; Attacco basso; Proprietario; A vite; Attacco obliquo; A scatto; Universale/multiplo; Altro